District of Columbia statutes.
48-801.04

Quotation of prices, services and charges.

The current selling price of all prescription drugs (including those not required to be posted) dispensed by each pharmacy, and the pharmacy’s discounts and professional and convenience services and charges therefor, shall be available and be quoted, correctly and free of charge, by the pharmacy upon request identifying the name, strength, and quantity prescribed by a physician, whether the request is made in person, in writing or by telephone.

History

Sept. 10, 1976, D.C. Law 1-81, title I, § 104, 23 DCR 2460
Apr. 7, 1977, D.C. Law 1-114, § 3(b), (d), 23 DCR 8743

Section References

This section is referenced in § 48-804.01.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 33-714.
1973 Ed., § 33-814.